Utah statutes.
13-14-307.   Franchisor's obligations upon termination or noncontinuation of
franchise or line-make.
(1)  Upon the termination or noncontinuation of a franchise or a line-make by
the franchisor, the franchisor shall pay the franchisee:
(a)  the franchisee's cost of new, undamaged, and unsold motor vehicles in the
franchisee's inventory acquired from the franchisor or another franchisee of
the same line-make representing both the current model year at the time of
termination or noncontinuation and the immediately prior model year vehicles:
(i)  plus any charges made by the franchisor, for distribution, delivery, or
taxes;
(ii)  plus the franchisee's cost of any accessories added on the vehicle,
except only those recreational vehicle accessories that are listed in the
franchisor's wholesale product literature as options for that vehicle shall be
repurchased; and
(iii)  less all allowances paid or credited to the franchisee by the
franchisor;
(b)  the franchisee's cost of new and undamaged motor vehicles in the
franchisee's inventory of demonstrator vehicles, reduced by 1% for each 1000
miles registered on the demonstrator vehicle's odometer, except recreational
vehicles whose cost shall be reduced by 2% for each 1,000 miles registered on
the odometer of demonstrator self-propelled recreational vehicles, exclusive
of miles incurred in delivery of the vehicle, and the cost of demonstrator
nonself-propelled recreational vehicles shall be reduced by 10% of the
franchisee's vehicle cost:
(i)  plus any charges made by the franchisor for distribution, delivery, or
taxes;
(ii)  plus the franchisee's cost of any accessories added on the vehicles,
except only those recreational vehicle accessories that are listed in the
franchisor's wholesale product literature as options for that vehicle shall be
repurchased; and
(iii)  less all allowances paid or credited to the franchisee by the
franchisor;
(c)  the cost of all new, undamaged, and unsold supplies, parts, and
accessories as set forth in the franchisor's catalog at the time of
termination or noncontinuation for the supplies, parts, and accessories, less
all allowances paid or credited to the franchisee by the franchisor;
(d)  the fair market value, but not less than the franchisee's depreciated
acquisition cost of each undamaged sign owned by the franchisee that bears a
common name, trade name, or trademark of the franchisor if acquisition of the
sign was recommended or required by the franchisor.  If a recreational vehicle
franchisee has a sign with multiple manufacturers listed, the franchisor is
only responsible for its pro rata portion of the sign;
(e)  the fair market value, but not less than the franchisee's depreciated
acquisition cost of all special tools, equipment, and furnishings acquired
from the franchisor or sources approved by the franchisor that were
recommended or required by the franchisor and are in good and usable
condition;
(f)  the cost of transporting, handling, packing, and loading motor vehicles,
supplies, parts, accessories, signs, special tools, equipment, and
furnishings;
(g)  reasonable compensation to the franchisee for any cost incurred
pertaining to the unexpired term of a lease agreement for the dealership's
existing location;
(h)  the negotiated fair market value of the dealership premises, based on the
fair market value of the real property, if the dealer opts to sell the
dealership premises; and
(i)  compensate the franchisee for the blue sky or goodwill of the dealership,
as determined in accordance with the applicable industry standards taking into
consideration the effect that the timing of the manufacturer's announcement of
discontinuance of a line make has or will have on future profitability of the
dealership.
(2)  Subsections (1)(g), (h), and (i) do not apply if a franchise is
terminated:
(a)  by the franchisor for cause as defined in Subsections 13-14-301(1)(b) and
(2)(a);
(b)  upon mutual written agreement of the franchisor and franchisee as
provided in Subsection 13-14-301(2)(b); or
(c)  upon voluntary termination by the franchisee as provided in Subsection
13-14-301(4).
(3)  The franchisor shall pay the franchisee the amounts specified in
Subsection (1) within 90 days after the tender of the property to the
franchisor if the franchisee:
(a)  has clear title to the property; and
(b)  is in a position to convey title to the franchisor.
(4)  If repurchased inventory, equipment, or demonstrator vehicles are subject
to a security interest, the franchisor may make payment jointly to the
franchisee and to the holder of the security interest.
